Mississippi, session 2026, HB979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. All state agencies, departments and institutions shall immediately cease providing state funds, whether through grant, contract, state-administered federal funds, or any other form, to any individual or entity that is directly affiliated with a physician, medical practice or other organization providing abortion services or facilitating the procurement of abortion services. SECTION 2.  Section 43-13-117.4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-13-117.4.  (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of Section 43-13-117, the division shall not authorize payment of part or all of the costs of care and services rendered by any entity that performs nontherapeutic abortions, maintains or operates a facility where nontherapeutic abortions are performed, or is affiliated with such an entity.  For purposes of this provision, "nontherapeutic abortions" means abortions that are not qualified for federal matching funds under the Medicaid program, 42 USC Section 1396 et seq., and as amended hereafter, and "affiliated with" means having a legal relationship with another entity created or governed by one or more written instruments that demonstrates common control, ownership, franchisee status or management, or that grants a license or other authority to utilize the other entity's brand name, trademark, service mark or other registered identification mark. (2)  (a)  For the purpose of this subsection (2), the term "abortion" has the same definition as provided in Section 41-41-45. (b)  The division shall initiate a comprehensive review and revision of its provider credentialing standards to ensure that only providers who are fully aligned with Mississippi's public policy objectives, including the protection of unborn life, are eligible to participate in the Medicaid program. (c)  The division shall immediately terminate or decline to renew any contract, memorandum or agreement, with or without cause, with any Medicaid provider or entity that, in the division's sole discretion, is not fully aligned with Mississippi's public policy objectives. (d) The division shall update its credentialing and contracting procedures to exclude from new or renewed participation in the Medicaid program any provider or entity that: (i)  Performs, refers for, or is affiliated with the performance of abortions not permitted under state law; or (ii)  Is under common ownership or control with an entity that is engaged in abortion-related activities inconsistent with state law. (e)  The division shall require, as a condition of participation in the Medicaid program, that all providers submit a signed attestation disclosing whether they or any related entities engage in abortion-related activities. (f)  The division shall adopt appropriate procedures to verify compliance with the requirements of this subsection (2) and is authorized to take any necessary enforcement actions, including nonrenewal, denial, exclusion or termination from the Medicaid program, for any provider found to be in violation of the provisions of this section. (g)  The division shall issue proposed rule changes as necessary and provider communications within sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act, and shall complete implementation of the revised standards within one hundred twenty (120) days after the effective date of this act. (h)  The division shall provide a written report to the Office of the Governor within one hundred fifty (150) days after the effective date of this act detailing its actions taken under this section, including any rule changes, number of providers affected, and compliance measures adopted. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.